New Jersey, session 221, S2208.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   The Secretary of Higher Education shall create and maintain a database of Educational Opportunity Fund student admissions.  The database shall detail the number of student openings in the Educational Opportunity Fund programs of each participating institution which are available for an eligible student.  The database shall be made available to campus Educational Opportunity Fund directors in order to improve communication about potential placements between campus directors and eligible students. b.    Each participating institution shall notify the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education when a student opening in an Educational Opportunity Fund program is filled.  The office shall update the database within one business day of receiving the notification. c.     In the event that an eligible student has not secured a placement in an Education Opportunity Fund program of a participating institution, the campus Educational Opportunity Fund director shall provide that student with information about student openings in the Educational Opportunity Fund programs of other participating institutions. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following the date of enactment.